Utah statutes.
17C-3-204.   Filing a copy of the economic development project area budget.

Each agency adopting an economic development project area budget shall:

(1)  within 30 days after adopting the project area budget, file a copy of the project area budget with the auditor of the county in which the project area is located, the State Tax Commission, the state auditor, the State Board of Education, and each taxing entity affected by the agency's collection of tax increment under the project area budget; and

(2)  if the project area budget allocates tax increment for housing under Section 17C-1-412, file a copy of the project area budget with the loan fund board.

